California statutes. Insurance Code
 including nondepartment actuaries and other consultants hired to implement this article, or a person with whom the commissioner has shared confidential information pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 311.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.2.

For a computation of minimum standard, except as provided in Sections 10489.3, 10489.4, and 10489.95, the minimum standard for the valuation of policies and contracts issued prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section shall be that provided by the laws in effect immediately prior to that date. Except as otherwise provided in Sections 10489.3, 10489.4, and 10489.95, the minimum standard for the valuation of those policies and contracts shall be the commissioners reserve valuation methods defined in Sections 10489.5, 10489.6, 10489.9, and 10489.95, 312 percent per annum interest, or in the case of life insurance policies and contracts, other than certain annuity and pure endowment contracts, issued on or after January 1, 1970, 4
 percent per annum interest for policies issued prior to January 1, 1980, 512 percent per annum interest may be used for single premium life insurance policies, and 412 percent per annum interest for all other policies issued on or after January 1, 1980, and the following tables:

(a) For ordinary policies of life insurance issued on the standard basis, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those policies—the Commissioners 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table for policies issued prior to the operative date of subdivision (a) of Section 10163.1, and the Commissioners 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table for policies issued on or after the operative date of subdivision (a) of Section 10163.1, as amended by Chapter 940 of the
 Statutes of 1982, and prior to the operative date of Section 10163.2, as amended by Chapter 28 of the Statutes of 1997, provided that for any category of policies issued on female risks, all modified net premiums and present values referred to in this article may be calculated according to an age not more than six years younger than the actual age of the insured. For policies issued on or after the original operative date of Section 10163.2, as amended by Chapter 28 of the Statutes of 1997, the following apply:

(1) The Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table.

(2) At the election of the company for any one or more specified plans of life insurance, the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with Ten-Year Select Mortality Factors.

(3) Any ordinary mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the
 NAIC, or its successor, that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such policies.

(b) For industrial life insurance policies issued on the standard basis, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in the policies, the 1941 Standard Industrial Mortality Table for policies issued prior to the operative date of subdivision (b) of Section 10163.1, of the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance as amended, and for policies issued on or after the operative date the Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table or any industrial mortality table adopted after 1980 by the NAIC that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for the policies.

(c) For individual annuity and
 pure endowment contracts issued prior to the compliance date of Section 10489.3, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in the policies: 1937 Standard Annuity Mortality Table or, at the option of the company, the Annuity Mortality Table for 1949, Ultimate, or any modification of these tables approved by the commissioner. However, the minimum standard for such contracts issued from January 1, 1968, through December 31, 1968, with commencement of benefits deferred not more than one year from date of issue, may be, at the option of the company, 4 percent per annum interest, and for contracts issued from January 1, 1969, to the compliance date of Section 10489.3, with commencement of benefits deferred not more than 10 years from the date of issue and with premiums payable in one sum may be, at the option of the company, 5 percent per annum interest.

(d) For group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any disability and
 accidental death benefits in the policies: the Group Annuity Mortality Table for 1951, a modification of the table approved by the commissioner, or, at the option of the company, any of the tables or modifications of the tables specified for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts. However, the minimum standard for annuities and pure endowments purchased or to be purchased prior to the compliance date of Section 10489.3, under group annuity and pure endowment contracts with considerations received on or after January 1, 1968, through December 31, 1968, may be, at the option of the company, 4 percent per annum interest, and for annuities and pure endowments purchased or to be purchased prior to the compliance date of Section 10489.3, under group annuity and pure endowment contracts with considerations received from January 1, 1969, to the compliance date of Section 10489.3, may be at the option of the company, 5 percent per annum interest.

(e) For total and permanent disability benefits in or supplementary to ordinary policies or contracts: for policies or contracts issued on or after January 1, 1966, the tables of Period 2 disablement rates and the 1930 to 1950 termination rates of the 1952 Disability Study of the Society of Actuaries, with due regard to the type of benefit or any tables of disablement rates and termination rates, adopted after 1980 by the NAIC that are approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for those policies; for policies or contracts issued on or after January 1, 1961, and prior to January 1, 1966, either those tables or, at the option of the company, the Class (3) Disability Table (1926); and for policies issued prior to January 1, 1961, the Class (3) Disability Table (1926). Any such table shall, for active lives, be combined with a mortality table permitted for calculating the reserves for life insurance
 policies.

(f) For accidental death benefits in or supplementary to policies issued on or after January 1, 1966: the 1959 Accidental Death Benefits Table or any accidental death benefits table, adopted after 1980 by the NAIC that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for those policies, for policies issued on or after January 1, 1961, and prior to January 1, 1966, either that table or, at the option of the company, the Inter-Company Double Indemnity Mortality Table; and for policies issued prior to January 1, 1961, the Inter-Company Double Indemnity Mortality Table. Either table shall be combined with a mortality table for calculating the reserves for life insurance policies.

(g) For group life insurance, life insurance issued on the substandard basis and other special benefits: tables
 approved by the commissioner.

(h) The commissioner may by bulletin withdraw approval to use tables that have been replaced by newly adopted tables.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 208.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.3.

(a) Except as provided in Section 10489.4, the minimum standard of valuation for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued on or after the operative date of this section and for annuities and pure endowments purchased on or after that operative date under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, shall be the commissioners reserve valuation methods defined in Sections 10489.5 and 10489.6 and the following tables and interest rates:

(1) For individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued prior to January 1, 1980, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those contracts: the 1971 Individual Annuity Mortality Table, or any modification of this table approved by the commissioner, and 6 percent per annum interest rate for all
 contracts with commencement of benefits deferred not more than 10 years from the date of issue and with premiums payable in one sum and 4 percent per annum interest for all other individual annuity and pure endowment contracts.

(2) For individual single premium immediate annuity contracts issued on or after January 1, 1980, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those contracts: the 1971 Individual Annuity Mortality Table or any individual annuity mortality table adopted after 1980 by the NAIC that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for these contracts, or any modification of these tables approved by the commissioner, and 712 percent per annum interest.

(3) For
 individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued on or after January 1, 1980, other than single premium immediate annuity contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those contracts, the 1971 Individual Annuity Mortality Table or any individual annuity mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the NAIC that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for those contracts, or any modification of these tables approved by the commissioner, and 512 percent per annum interest for single premium deferred annuity and pure endowment contracts, and 412 percent per annum interest for all other individual annuity and pure endowment contracts.

(4) For annuities and pure endowments purchased prior to January 1, 1980, under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits purchased under those contracts: the 1971 Group Annuity Mortality Table or any modification of this table approved by the commissioner, and 6 percent per annum interest.

(5) For annuities and pure endowments purchased on or after January 1, 1980, under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits purchased under those contracts: the 1971 Group Annuity Mortality Table, or any group annuity mortality table adopted after 1980 by the NAIC that is approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for annuities and pure endowments, or any modification of these tables approved by the commissioner, and
 712 percent interest.

(6) All individual annuity and pure endowment contracts entered into prior to January 1, 1980, and all annuities and pure endowments purchased prior to January 1, 1980, under group annuity and pure endowment contracts shall remain subject to the provisions of Article 3A (commencing with Section 10489.1) as it existed prior to January 1, 1980.

(b) The commissioner may, by bulletin, withdraw approval to use tables that have been replaced by newly adopted tables.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 209.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.4.

(a) The interest rates used in determining the minimum standard for the valuation of the following shall be the calendar year statutory valuation interest rates as defined in this section:

(1) Life insurance policies issued in a particular calendar year, on or after the operative date of Section 10163.2 as amended by Section 28 of the Statutes of 1997.

(2) Individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued in a particular calendar year on or after January 1, 1982.

(3) Annuities and pure endowments purchased in a particular calendar year on or after January 1, 1982, under
 group annuity and pure endowment contracts.

(4) The net increase, if any, in a particular calendar year after January 1, 1982, in amounts held under guaranteed interest contracts.

(b) (1) The calendar year statutory valuation interest rates, expressed in the following formulas as “I,” shall be determined as follows and the results rounded to the nearest one-fourth of 1 percent:

(A) For life insurance:
I = .03 + W(R1– .03) + W2(R2– .09) 
 Where R1 is the lesser of R and .09,R2 is the greater of R and .09,R is the reference interest rate defined in this section,W is the weighting factor defined in this section.(B) For single premium immediate annuities and for annuity benefits involving life contingencies arising from other annuities with cash settlement options and from guaranteed interest contracts
 with cash settlement options:I = .03 + W(R - .03) WhereR is the reference interest rate defined in this section, W is the weighting factor defined in this section.(C) For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on an issue year basis, except as stated in
 subparagraph (B), the formula for life insurance stated in subparagraph (A) shall apply to annuities and guaranteed interest contracts with guarantee durations in excess of 10 years and the formula for single premium immediate annuities stated in subparagraph (B) shall apply to annuities and guaranteed interest contracts with guarantee duration of 10 years or less.

(D) For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the formula for single premium immediate annuities stated in subparagraph (B) shall apply.

(E) For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a change in fund basis, the formula for single premium immediate annuities stated in subparagraph (B) shall apply.

(2) However, if the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for a life insurance policy issued in any calendar year determined without reference to this sentence differs from the corresponding actual rate for similar policies issued in the immediately preceding calendar year by less than one-half of 1 percent, the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for the life insurance policies shall be equal to the corresponding actual rate for the immediately preceding calendar year. For purposes of applying the immediately preceding sentence, the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for life insurance policies issued in a calendar year shall be determined for 1980 (using the reference interest rate defined in 1979) and shall be determined for each subsequent calendar year regardless of when Section 10163.2, as amended, becomes operative.

(c) The weighting factors referred to in the formulas stated above are
 given in the following tables:

(1) Weighting Factors for Life Insurance:

Guarantee Duration (Years)Weighting Factors10 or less .50More than 10, but not more than 20 .45More than 20 .35

For life insurance, the guarantee duration is the maximum number of years the life insurance can remain in force on a basis guaranteed in the policy or under options to convert to plans of life insurance with premium rates or nonforfeiture values or both that are guaranteed in the original policy.

(2) Weighting factors for single premium immediate annuities and for annuity benefits involving life contingencies arising from other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options shall be .80.

(3) Weighting factors for other annuities and for guaranteed interest contracts, except as stated in paragraph (2), shall be as specified in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), according to the rules and definitions in subparagraphs (D), (E), and (F):

(A) For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on an issue year basis:

Guarantee Duration (Years)Weighting Factor for Plan TypeABC5 or less:.80.60.50More than 5, but not more than 10:.75.60.50More than 10, but not more than 20:.65.50.45More than 20:.45.35.35

(B) For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on a change in fund basis, the factors shown in subparagraph (A) increased by:Plan TypeABC.15.25.05(C) For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on an issue year basis, other than those with no cash settlement options, that do not guarantee interest on considerations received more than one year after issue or purchase and for annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on a change in fund basis that do not guarantee interest rates on considerations received more than 12 months beyond the valuation date, the factors shown in subparagraph (A) or derived in subparagraph (B) increased by:Plan TypeABC.05.05.05(D) For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, the guarantee duration is the number of years for which the contract guarantees interest rates in excess of the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for life insurance policies with guarantee duration in excess of 20 years. For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the guaranteed duration is the number of years from the date of issue or date of purchase to the date annuity benefits are scheduled to commence.

(E) Plan type as used in the
 above tables is defined as follows:

(i) For Plan Type A: At any time a policyholder may withdraw funds only (I) with an adjustment to reflect changes in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the insurance company, (II) without an adjustment but installments over five years or more, (III) as an immediate life annuity, or (IV) no withdrawal is permitted.

(ii) For Plan Type B: Before expiration of the interest rate guarantee, a policyholder may withdraw funds only (I) with an adjustment to reflect changes in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the insurance company, (II) without an adjustment but in installments over five years or more, or (III) no withdrawal is permitted. At the end of the interest rate guarantee, funds may be withdrawn without an adjustment in a single sum or installments over less than five years.

(iii) For Plan Type C: Policyholder may withdraw funds before expiration of interest rate guarantee in a single sum or installments over less than five years either (I) without adjustment to reflect changes in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the insurance company, or (II) subject only to a fixed surrender charge stipulated in the contract as a percentage of the fund.

(F) A company may elect to value guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options and annuities with cash settlement options on either an issue year basis or on a change in fund basis. Guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options and other annuities with no cash settlement options shall be valued on an issue year basis. As used in this section, an issue year basis of valuation refers to a valuation basis under which the interest rate used to determine the minimum
 valuation standard for the entire duration of the annuity or guaranteed interest contract is the calendar year valuation interest rate for the year of issue or year of purchase of the annuity or guaranteed interest contract, and the change in fund basis of valuation refers to a valuation basis under which the interest rate used to determine the minimum valuation standard applicable to each change in the fund held under the annuity or guaranteed interest contract is the calendar year valuation interest rate for the year of the change in the fund.

(d) The reference interest rate referred to in subdivision (b) shall be defined as follows:

(1) For life insurance, the lesser of the average over a period of 36 months and the average over a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year preceding the year of issue, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned
 corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

(2) For single premium immediate annuities and for annuity benefits involving life contingencies arising from other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, the average over a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or year of purchase, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

(3) For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a year of issue basis, except as stated in subdivision (b), with guarantee duration in excess of 10 years, the lesser of the average over a period of 36 months and the average over a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of
 issue or purchase, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

(4) For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a year of issue basis, except as stated in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), with guarantee duration of 10 years or less, the average over a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or purchase, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

(5) For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the average over a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or purchase, of the monthly average of the
 composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

(6) For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a change in fund basis, except as stated in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the average over a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of the change in the fund, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

(e) If the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds is no longer published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., or in the event that the NAIC determines that the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., is no longer appropriate for the
 determination of the reference interest rate, then an alternative method for determination of the reference interest rate adopted by the NAIC and approved by regulation promulgated by the commissioner may be substituted.

(f) This section shall apply to all certificates and contracts issued by a fraternal benefit society.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 10.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 10489.6, 10489.9, and 10489.95, reserves according to the commissioners reserve valuation method, for the life insurance and endowment benefits of policies providing for a uniform amount of insurance and requiring the payment of uniform premiums shall be the excess, if any, of the present value, at the date of valuation, of the future guaranteed benefits provided for by those policies, over the then present value of any future modified net premiums therefor. The modified net premiums for a policy shall be the uniform percentage of the respective contract premiums for the benefits such that the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of all modified net premiums shall be equal to the sum of
 the then present value of the benefits provided for by the policy and the excess of paragraph (1) over paragraph (2), as follows:

(1) A net level annual premium equal to the present value, at the date of issue of the benefits provided for after the first policy year, divided by the present value, at the date of issue, of an annuity of one per annum payable on the first and each subsequent anniversary of the policy on which a premium falls due. However, the net level annual premium shall not exceed the net level annual premium on the 19-year premium whole life plan for insurance of the same amount at an age one year higher than the age at issue of the policy.

(2) A net one-year term premium for the benefits provided for in the first policy year.

(b) For a life insurance policy issued on or after January 1, 1986, for
 which the contract premium in the first policy year exceeds that of the second year and for which no comparable additional benefit is provided in the first year for the excess and that provides an endowment benefit or a cash surrender value or a combination in an amount greater than the excess premium, the reserve according to the commissioners reserve valuation method as of any policy anniversary occurring on or before the assumed ending date defined herein as the first policy anniversary on which the sum of any endowment benefit and any cash surrender value then available is greater than the excess premium shall, except as otherwise provided in Section 10489.9, be the greater of the reserve as of the policy anniversary calculated as described in subdivision (a) and the reserve as of the policy anniversary calculated as described in subdivision (a), but with (1) the value defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) being reduced by 15 percent of the amount of the excess first year premium, (2) all present
 values of benefits and premiums being determined without reference to premiums or benefits provided for by the policy after the assumed ending date, (3) the policy being assumed to mature on that date as an endowment, and (4) the cash surrender value provided on that date being considered as an endowment benefit. In making the above comparison, the mortality and interest bases stated in Sections 10489.2 and 10489.4 shall be used.

(c) Reserves according to the commissioners reserve valuation method shall be calculated by a method consistent with subdivisions (a) and (b) for paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive. However, any extra premiums charged because of impairments or special hazards shall be disregarded in the determination of modified net premiums.

(1) Life insurance policies providing for a varying amount of insurance or requiring the payment of varying premiums.

(2) Group annuity and pure endowment contracts purchased under a retirement plan or plan of deferred compensation, established or maintained by an employer (including a partnership or sole proprietorship) or by an employee organization, or by both, other than a plan providing individual retirement accounts or individual retirement annuities pursuant to Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code, as now or hereafter amended.

(3) Disability and accidental death benefits in all policies and contracts.

(4) All other benefits, except life insurance and endowment benefits in life insurance policies and benefits provided by all other annuity and pure endowment contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 11.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.6.

(a) This section shall apply to all annuity and pure endowment contracts other than group annuity and pure endowment contracts purchased under a retirement plan or plan of deferred compensation, established or maintained by an employer (including a partnership or sole proprietorship) or by an employee organization, or by both, other than a plan providing individual retirement accounts or individual retirement annuities pursuant to Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code, as now or hereafter amended.

(b) Reserves according to the commissioners annuity reserve method for benefits under annuity or pure endowment contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in the
 contracts, shall be the greatest of the respective excesses of the present values, at the date of valuation, of the future guaranteed benefits, including guaranteed nonforfeiture benefits, provided for by the contracts at the end of each respective contract year, over the present value, at the date of valuation, of any future valuation considerations derived from future gross considerations, required by the terms of the contract, that become payable prior to the end of the respective contract year. The future guaranteed benefits shall be determined by using the mortality table, if any, and the interest rate, or rates, specified in the contracts for determining guaranteed benefits. The valuation considerations are the portions of the respective gross considerations applied under the terms of the contracts to determine nonforfeiture values.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 12.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.7.

(a) A company’s aggregate reserves for all life insurance policies, excluding disability and accidental death benefits, shall not be less than the aggregate reserves calculated in accordance with the methods set forth in Sections 10489.5, 10489.6, 10489.9, and 10489.93 and the mortality table or tables and rate or rates of interest used in calculating nonforfeiture benefits for the policies.

(b) The aggregate reserves for all policies, contracts, and benefits shall not be less than the aggregate reserves determined by the appointed actuary to be necessary to render the opinion required by Section 10489.15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 13.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.8.

(a) Reserves for any category of policies, contracts, or benefits established by the commissioner may be calculated, at the option of the company, according to any standards that produce greater aggregate reserves for the category than those calculated according to the minimum standard provided in this article, but the rate or rates of interest used for policies and contracts, other than annuity and pure endowment contracts, shall not be greater than the corresponding rate or rates of interest used in calculating any nonforfeiture benefits provided in the policies or contracts.

(b) A company, which adopts at any time a standard of valuation producing greater aggregate reserves than
 those calculated according to the minimum standard provided under this article, may adopt a lower standard of valuation with the approval of the commissioner, but not lower than the minimum provided in this article. However, for the purposes of this section, the holding of additional reserves previously determined by a qualified actuary to be necessary to render the opinion required by Section 10489.15 shall not be deemed to be the adoption of a higher standard of valuation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 14.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.9.

(a) If in any contract year the gross premium charged by any life insurer on any policy or contract is less than the valuation net premium for the policy or contract calculated by the method used in calculating the reserve thereon but using the minimum valuation standards of mortality and rate of interest, the minimum reserve required for such policy or contract shall be the greater of either the reserve calculated according to the mortality table, rate of interest, and method actually used for such policy or contract, or the reserve calculated by the method actually used for such policy or contract but using the minimum valuation standards of mortality and rate of interest and replacing the valuation net premium by the actual gross premium in
 each contract year for which the valuation net premium exceeds the actual gross premium. The minimum valuation standards of mortality and rate of interest referred to in this section are those standards stated in Sections 10489.2, 10489.3, and 10489.4.

(b) For a life insurance policy issued on or after January 1, 1986, for which the gross premium in the first policy year exceeds that of the second year and for which no comparable additional benefit is provided in the first year for such excess and that provides an endowment benefit or a cash surrender value or a combination thereof in an amount greater than such excess premium, the foregoing provisions of this section shall be applied as if the method actually used in calculating the reserve for such policy were the method described in Section 10489.5, ignoring the second paragraph of Section 10489.5. The minimum reserve at each policy anniversary of such a policy shall be the greater of the
 minimum reserve calculated in accordance with Section 10489.5, including the second paragraph of that section, and the minimum reserve calculated in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 15.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.93.

In the case of a plan of life insurance that provides for future premium determination, the amounts of which are to be determined by the insurance company based on then estimates of future experience, or in the case of a plan of life insurance or annuity that is of a nature that the minimum reserves cannot be determined by the methods described in Sections 10489.5, 10489.6, and 10489.9, the reserves that are held under the plan shall:

(a) Be appropriate in relation to the benefits and the pattern of premiums for that plan; and

(b) Be computed by a method that is consistent with the principles of this Standard Valuation Law, as determined
 by regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 16.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.94.

(a) The commissioner may issue a bulletin to provide tables of select mortality factors and rules for their use, rules concerning a minimum standard for the valuation of plans with nonlevel premiums of benefits, and rules concerning a minimum standard for the valuation of plans with secondary guarantees. The bulletin authorized by this subdivision shall have the same force and effect, and may be enforced by the commissioner to the same extent and degree, as regulations issued by the commissioner. The commissioner may also adopt regulations to implement this section.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the bulletin described in subdivision (a) and the superseding
 regulations shall contain the provisions of the NAIC Valuation of Life Insurance Policies Model Regulation Number 830.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 17.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.95.

For accident and health insurance contracts issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the standard prescribed in the valuation manual is the minimum standard of valuation required under subdivision (b) of Section 10489.12. For disability and accident and health insurance contracts issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, the minimum standard of valuation is the standard adopted by the commissioner by regulation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 19.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.96.

(a) For policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the standard prescribed in the valuation manual is the minimum standard of valuation required under subdivision (b) of Section 10489.12, except as provided under subdivision (e) or (g).

(b) (1) The operative date of the valuation manual is January 1 of the first calendar year following the first July 1 as of which all of the following have occurred:

(A) The valuation manual has been adopted by the NAIC by an affirmative vote of at least 42 members, or three-fourths of the members voting, whichever is greater.

(B) The Standard Valuation
 Law, as amended by the NAIC in 2009, or legislation including substantially similar terms and provisions, has been enacted by states representing greater than 75 percent of the direct premiums written as reported in the following annual statements submitted for 2008: life, accident, and health annual statements, health annual statements, or fraternal annual statements.

(C) The Standard Valuation Law, as amended by the NAIC in 2009, or legislation including substantially similar terms and provisions, has been enacted by at least 42 of the following 55 jurisdictions: The 50 states of the United States, American Samoa, the United States Virgin Islands, the District of Columbia, Guam, and Puerto Rico.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the valuation manual shall not become operative until the commissioner certifies that adequate funding has been appropriated by the Legislature, and
 that all other necessary resources, including, but not limited to, adequate staff, are available and sufficient to enable the commissioner to carry out the duties required pursuant to Section 10489.992, and all other duties imposed on the commissioner pursuant to Senate Bill 696 of the 2015–16 Regular Session. The commissioner shall make that certification by submitting a letter to the Chairs of the Assembly Committee on Insurance and the Senate Committee on Insurance stating that the funding and other necessary resources are available and sufficient to carry out those duties. The commissioner shall post a notice on the department’s Internet Web site immediately after submitting that certification letter stating that the certification letter has been submitted and that the provisions of the valuation manual are in effect.

(c) Unless a change in the valuation manual specifies a later effective date, changes to the valuation manual shall be
 effective on January 1 following the date when all of the following have occurred:

(1) The change to the valuation manual has been adopted by the NAIC by an affirmative vote representing:

(A) At least three-fourths of the members of the NAIC voting, but not less than a majority of the total membership.

(B) Members of the NAIC representing jurisdictions totaling greater than 75 percent of the direct premiums written as reported in the following annual statements most recently available prior to the vote in subparagraph (A): life, accident, and health annual statement, health annual statements, or fraternal annual statements.

(2) The commissioner has issued an order adopting the valuation manual with the changes. The commissioner shall issue the order
 only if he or she finds that the conditions set forth in paragraph (1) have been satisfied.

(d) The valuation manual shall specify all of the following:

(1) Minimum valuation standards for and definitions of the policies or contracts subject to subdivision (b) of Section 10489.12. Those minimum valuation standards shall be:

(A) The commissioners reserve valuation method for life insurance contracts, other than annuity contracts, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 10489.12.
